Washington statutes.
RCW 43.119.060

Interagency committee of state employed women—Staffing support.

The Washington state women's commission must provide staffing support to the interagency committee of state employed women, a volunteer organization that aims to better the lives of state employees by advising the governor and agencies on policies that affect state-employed women.

[ 2018 c 98 s 7.]